Arkansas, session 2025, HB1035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Online Voter
Registration Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 5(b)(1), concerning
the duties of voter registration officials, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The Secretary of State is designated as the chief election
official. The Secretary of State shall prepare and distribute the pre-
addressed postcard mail voter registration application forms described in 51-
6 of this amendment. Mail voter registration application forms shall serve
for purposes of initial applications to register and shall also serve for
changes of name, address, or party affiliation. Bilingual (Spanish/English)
*SSS011*
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
forms, braille forms, and large print forms shall be available upon request.
The Secretary of State shall make the state mail voter registration
application form available for distribution through governmental and private
entities with particular emphasis on making them available for organized
voter registration programs. Any person may distribute state registration
cards. All registration cards shall be distributed to the public without
charge.
(B)(i) The Secretary of State shall prepare and administer
online voter registration application forms.
(ii) Online voter registration application forms may
serve for purposes of initial applications to register and may serve for
changes of name, address, or party affiliation.
(iii) The system used to access the online voter
registration application forms shall be accessible without charge.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 5(e), concerning the
duties of registration officials, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(f)(1) The Secretary of State may promulgate rules including detailed
specifications for the online voter registration application forms, and the
security measures for the protection of the voter registration applicant
information and the voter registration list.
(2) A rule promulgated under subdivision (f)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Be consistent with this amendment and the laws passed
by the General Assembly;
(B) Be of uniform application across the state; and
(C) Follow the procedure for review and approval by the
General Assembly under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq.
(3) The Secretary of State shall not promulgate an emergency
rule under this subsection (f) and under the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., within one hundred eighty (180) days of a
federal election unless approved by the General Assembly or if the General
Assembly is not in session, by the Legislative Council.

01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
SECTION 4. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(1), concerning
statements included on the mail voter registration application form, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The mail voter registration application form and the online
voter registration application form may only require identifying information,
including a physical signature or mark, an electronic signature or mark, and
other information, including data relating to previous registration by the
applicant, as is necessary to assess the applicant's eligibility and to
administer voter registration and other parts of the election process.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(3)(F),
concerning statements included on the mail voter registration application
form, is amended to read as follows:
(F) A physical signature or mark or an electronic
signature or mark made under penalty of perjury that the applicant meets each
requirement for voter registration;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(4), concerning
statements included on the mail voter registration application form, is
amended to read as follows:
(4) The following information may be requested on the
registration card or online voter registration application form, but it shall
not be required:
(A) Telephone number where the applicant may be contacted;
and
(B) Political party with which the applicant wishes to be
affiliated, if any.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(5), concerning
statements included on the mail voter registration application form, is
amended to read as follows:
(5) The mail voter registration application form or the online
voter registration application form shall not include any a requirement for
notarization or other formal authentication.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(6), concerning
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
statements included on the mail voter registration application form, is
amended to read as follows:
(6) The mail voter registration application form and the online
voter registration application form shall include the following questions
along with boxes or other means for the applicant to check “yes” or “no” in
response:
(A) “Are you a citizen of the United States of America
and an Arkansas resident?”;
(B) “Will you be eighteen (18) years of age on or before
election day?”;
(C) “Are you presently adjudged mentally incompetent by a
court of competent jurisdiction?”; and
(D) “Have you ever been convicted of a felony without
your sentence having been discharged or pardoned?”.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(7), concerning
statements included on the mail voter registration application form, is
amended to read as follows:
(7) The mail voter registration application form and the online
voter registration application form shall include the following statements
immediately following the questions asked in subdivision (a)(6) of this
section:
(A) “If you checked ‘No’ in response to either questions A
or B, do not complete this form.”;
(B) “If you checked ‘Yes’ in response to either questions
C or D, do not complete this form.”; and
(C) The mail-in voter registration application form and
the online voter registration application form shall include the following
statement:
“If your voter registration application form is
submitted by mail or online and you are registering for the first time, and
you do not have a valid driver's license number or Social Security number, in
order to avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting for the
first time you must submit with the mailed voter registration application
form: (a) a current and valid photo identification; or (b) a copy of a
current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
government document that shows your name and address.”

SECTION 10. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 8(a)(2), concerning
voter registration application records and reports, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The Secretary of State shall transmit all mail voter
registration applications application forms and online voter registration
application forms to the appropriate permanent registrar no later than ten
(10) days after the date of receipt. When applications mail voter
registration application forms and online voter registration application
forms are received within five (5) days before the last day of registration
for an election, they must be transmitted no later than five (5) days after
date of receipt. If mail voter registration application forms and online
voter registration application forms are received by the wrong election
office, they shall be forwarded to the appropriate permanent registrar not
later than the fifth day after receipt.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 8(c)(1), concerning
voter registration application records and reports, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The Secretary of State shall collect, maintain, and publish
monthly statistical data reflecting the number of new voter registration
applications, changes of address, name, and party affiliation, and
declinations received by mail, electronically, and in:
(A) state State revenue offices;
(B) public Public assistance agencies;
(C) disabilities Disabilities agencies;
(D) recruitment Recruitment offices of the Armed Forces of
the United States United States Armed Forces;
(E) public Public libraries; and
(F) offices Offices of the Arkansas National Guard.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(c), concerning
the application to register to vote, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(4) The permanent registrar shall register qualified applicants
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
who apply to register to vote by using an online voter registration
application form if:
(A) The online voter registration application form is
submitted no later than thirty (30) days before the date of the election; and
(B) The applicant for online voter registration provides a
current valid driver's license number or the last four (4) digits of the
applicant's Social Security number.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10(a), concerning
the transfer and change of status for a registered voter, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) Upon a change of legal residence within the county, or a change of
name, any registered voter may cause his or her registration to be
transferred to his or her new address or new name by completing and mailing a
federal or state mail voter registration application form, by completing an
online voter registration application form, by updating his or her address at
the Office of Driver Services, any state revenue office, public assistance
agency, disabilities agency, or other voter registration agency, by signing a
mailed request to the permanent registrar, giving his or her present address
and the address at which he or she was last registered or his or her present
name and the name under which he or she was last registered, or by applying
in person at the office of the permanent registrar.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 10(b)(1),
concerning the transfer and change of status for a registered voter, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(b)(1) Upon a change of legal residence from one (1) county within the
state to another county within the state, any registered voter may cause his
or her registration to be transferred to the new county at his or her new
address by:
(A) Completing and mailing a federal or state mail voter
registration application form;
(B) Updating his or her new address at a voter
registration agency, including without limitation the Office of Driver
Services or a state revenue office, public assistance agency, or disabilities
agency;
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
(C) Signing a mailed request to the permanent registrar
giving the voter's present address and the address at which the voter was
last registered; or
(D) Applying in person for the transfer at the office of
the permanent registrar. ; or
(E) Completing an online voter registration application
form.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 7-5-201(e)(1), concerning voter
qualification, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) A person registering to vote by mail or by an online voter
registration application form and who has not previously voted in a federal
election in this state shall:
(A) Present to the election official a current and valid
photo identification or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement,
government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name
and address of the voter when appearing to vote in person either early or at
the polls on election day; or
(B) When voting by mail, submit with the ballot a copy of
a current and valid photo identification or a copy of a current utility bill,
bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that
shows the name and address of the voter.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 7-5-201(e)(3)(E) and (F), concerning voter
qualification, are amended to read as follows:
(E) Persons who register to vote by mail or by an online
voter registration application form and submit as part of the registration
any of the identification documents listed in subdivision (e)(1) of this
section; or
(F) Persons who register to vote by mail or by an online
voter registration application form and submit with the registration either a
driver's license number or at least the last four (4) digits of the
individual's Social Security number and with respect to whom a state or local
election official matches the license number or Social Security number with
an existing state identification record bearing the same number, name, and
date of birth as provided in the registration.
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 7-5-305(a)(8)(B)(iii), concerning first-
time voter identification, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) A first-time voter who registers by mail or by
an online voter registration application form without providing
identification when registering and desires to vote in person but who does
not meet the identification requirements of § 7-5-201(e) may cast a
provisional ballot.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 5, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-5-325. Online voter registration.
(a) The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain a secure
online voter registration system.
(b) The online voter registration system shall allow:
(1) The submission of an online voter registration application
form meeting the requirements established in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
51, § 6; and
(2) A voter registration to be completed using the online voter
registration system and after completion on the online voter registration
system, to be included on the voter registration list.
(c) The Secretary of State shall:
(1) Employ security measures the Secretary of State determines
to be necessary to ensure the integrity, accuracy, and security of the online
voter registration system; and
(2) Establish and implement a process for the verification of
address information submitted by a person registering to vote, or a
registered voter updating his or her address when:
(A) Using the online voter registration application form;
(B) Providing address information to a state agency
charged with voter registration address information; or
(C) Using a state mail voter registration application
form.
(d) Each person using the online voter registration system shall be
informed as to whether:
(1) The online voter registration application form has been
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
successfully submitted and is pending approval; or
(2) The online voter registration system encountered an error in
processing the online voter registration application form and the online
voter registration application form was not successfully submitted.
(e)(1) The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement the requirements under this section under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(2) The Secretary of State shall not promulgate emergency rules
necessary to implement this section under the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., within one hundred eighty (180) days of a
federal election unless approved by the General Assembly or if the General
Assembly is not in session, by the Legislative Council.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 7-5-412(a)(2)(B) concerning identification
for absentee ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A copy of a current and valid photographic
identification or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement,
government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name
and address of the first-time voter, for first-time voters who registered by
mail or by an online voter registration application form. However, this
requirement does not apply if:
(i) The voter registered to vote by mail or by an
online voter registration application form and provided the identification at
that time; or
(ii) The first-time voter registered to vote by mail
or by an online voter registration application form and submitted his or her
driver's license number or at least the last four (4) digits of his or her
Social Security number at the time and this information matches the
information in an existing state identification record bearing the same
number, name, and date of birth as provided in the registration.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 7-5-416(b)(1)(F), concerning the counting
of absentee ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(F)(i) After the election official reads aloud from the
statement, the election officials shall compare the name, address, date of
birth, and signature of the voter's absentee application with the voter's
01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 H1/23/25 HB1035
statement and,:
(a) for For first-time voters who registered
by mail, the first-time voter's identification document unless the voter
previously provided identification at the time of mailing the voter
registration application.; or
(b) For first-time voters who registered using
an online voter registration application form, the first-time voter's
identification document unless the voter previously provided identification
at the time of electronically registering using an online voter registration
application form.
(ii) If the county board of election commissioners
determines that the absentee application and the voter's statement do not
compare as to name, residential voting address, date of birth, and signature,
the absentee ballot shall not be counted.
(iii) If a first-time voter fails to provide the
required identification with the absentee ballot or at the time of mailing
the voter registration application, or at the time of registration using an
online voter registration application form, then the absentee application,
absentee ballot envelope, and voter's statement shall be placed in an
envelope marked “provisional” and the absentee ballot shall be considered a
provisional ballot;

SECTION 21. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act shall become effective on and
after January 1, 2026.

/s/A. Collins










01-23-2025 09:40:55 SSS011